Utah statutes.
19-8-104.   Program.

(1)  There is created under this chapter and within the Department of Environmental Quality the Voluntary Environmental Cleanup Program.

(2)  The program shall be administered by the executive director.

(3)  The program shall be funded by application fees and imposed oversight costs as provided in this chapter.

